dictionaries/isv_cyr_hunspell_dict.dic
могти/CK
овес/CL
мој/CM
млєти/CN
канја/CO
мгла/CP
умрети/CQ
нас/CR
нєкакы/CS
ничиј/CM
искати/CT
нула/CU
одкрыти/CV
свој/CM
чиј/CM
иночиј/CM
свинја/CO
волја/CO
цибулја/CO
ваш/CM
покрыти/CV
кухнја/CO
капја/CO
наш/CM
студнја/CO
ролја/CO
пустынја/CO
помогти/CK
твој/CM
земја/CO
трговја/CO
дынја/CO
пєснја/CO
черешнја/CO
чаплја/CO
вечерја/CO
бурја/CO
једнакы/CS
нєчиј/CM
сємја/CO
такы/CS
никакы/CS
купалјнја/CO
кулја/CO
каварнја/CO
горечнја/CO
копалјнја/CO
трети/CQ
хвилја/CO
укрыти/CV
лєчилјнја/CO
всакы/CS
читалјнја/CO
кошулја/CO
стригти/CK
остригти/CK
молнја/CO
спалјнја/CO
господынја/CO
изтрети/CQ
смлєти/CN
кој/CM
кој/CM
нєкој/CM
изумрети/CQ
сотнја/CO
цвекла/CP
чајилјнја/CO
четвртина/CU
десетина/CU
гостилјнја/CO
инакы/CS
кнегынја/CO
конопја/CO
лобанја/CO
мучилјнја/CO
недєлја/CO
осмина/CU
оземја/CO
петина/CU
седмнадсетина/CU
третина/CU
заложилјнја/CO
земја/CO
дикы/CS
највеликы/CS
осмнадсетина/CU
сєдилјнја/CO
шестина/CU
седмина/CU
деветина/CU
сотина/CU
стотина/CU
бронја/CO
коликоракы/CS
изискати/CT
острєгти/CK
поискати/CT
поврхнја/CO
скрыти/CV
скринја/CO
вишнја/CO
заклјучилјнја/CO
зорја/CO
овакы/CS
онакы/CS
коликы/CS
селикы/CS
толикы/CS
оволикы/CS
оноликы/CS
вселикы/CS
иноликы/CS
метла/CP
овчарнја/CO
скрыти/CV
улја/CO
закрыти/CV
легти/CK
легти/CK
многоракы/CS
налегти/CK
прємогти/CK
разлегти/CK
месарнја/CO
пекарнја/CO
разпрја/CO
впрегти/CK
запрегти/CK
милја/CO
протрети/CQ
стрєгти/CK
стрєгти/CK
неволја/CO
кукла/CP
наковалјнја/CO
фасолја/CO
чекалјнја/CO
накрыти/CV
банја/CO
безрукы/CS
дропја/CO
ходулја/CO
игуменја/CO
изнемогти/CK
једнорукы/CS
јутренја/CO
ковалјнја/CO
купја/CO
кузнја/CO
лазнја/CO
натрети/CQ
невеликы/CS
обтрети/CQ
одрыти/CV
одстригти/CK
одтрети/CQ
рабынја/CO
разкрыти/CV
размлєти/CN
размыти/CV
разрыти/CV
разтрети/CQ
смогти/CK
вафлја/CO
ванилја/CO
викунја/CO
замрети/CQ
книгарнја/CO
лєворукы/CS
праворукы/CS
деснорукы/CS
промыти/CV
флотилја/CO
изпрегти/CK
завыти/CV
измогти/CK
гаргулја/CO
утрети/CQ
вырыти/CV
обтрети/CQ
пристригти/CK
тополја/CO
милостынја/CO
монахынја/CO
челја/CO
понєкој/CM
всекакы/CS
изискати/CT
пивоварнја/CO
лјутнја/CO
саблја/CO
плєвнја/CO
датулја/CO
факлја/CO
главнја/CO
сукнја/CO
скотобојнја/CO
дупја/CO
излегти/CK
легти/CK
излегти/CK
марулја/CO
